New Jersey, session 222, S2543.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. In no case shall the Commissioner of Health, the Governor, or any other entity of State, county, or municipal government require a child to be immunized against COVID-19 or the human papillomavirus, as a condition of attendance at a public primary or secondary school, or for any other reason. b.    In no case shall the Commissioner of Health, the Governor, or any other entity of State, county, or municipal government cause or require a public primary or secondary school to conduct an inquiry into whether a child is immunized against COVID-19 or the human papillomavirus. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.